Vermont, session 2025-2026, H361.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 2351a is amended to read:
§ 2351a. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(5) “Community police oversight board” has the same meaning as in
24 V.S.A. chapter 56.
Sec. 2. 20 V.S.A. § 2358 is amended to read:
§ 2358. MINIMUM TRAINING STANDARDS; DEFINITIONS
* * *
(b) The Council shall offer or approve basic training and annual in-service
training for each of the following three levels of law enforcement officer
certification outlined in this subsection in accordance with the scope of
practice for each level, and shall determine by rule the scope of practice for
each level in accordance with this section. A community police oversight
board may make recommendations to the Council concerning basic training
and annual in-service training requirements for the Council to offer or approve.
If the Council does not adopt a community police oversight board’s
recommendation, it shall provide the board with its reasons in writing. The
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 3 of 17
training requirements for the three levels of law enforcement officer
certification are as follows:
* * *
(g) The Council shall not offer or approve, and a community police
oversight board shall not recommend, any training on the use of a chokehold as
defined in section 2401 of this chapter, except for training designed to identify
and prevent the use of chokeholds.
Sec. 3. 20 V.S.A. § 2401 is amended to read:
§ 2401. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
* * *
(4) “Effective internal affairs program” means that a law enforcement
agency does all of the following:
* * *
(E) Civilian review. Provides for review of officer discipline by
civilians, which may be a selectboard or other elected or appointed body, at
least for the conduct required to be reported to the Council under this
subchapter Community police oversight board investigation. Promptly report
all complaints pursuant to subdivision (4)(A) of this section to the community
police oversight board having jurisdiction. The agency shall permit and fully
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 4 of 17
cooperate with any action the community police oversight board may
undertake pursuant to its authority.
* * *
Sec. 4. 20 V.S.A. § 2403 is amended to read:
§ 2403. LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES; DUTY TO REPORT
(a)(1) The executive officer of a law enforcement agency or the chair of the
agency’s civilian review board shall report to the Council and the community
police oversight board having jurisdiction within 10 business days if any of the
following occur in regard to a law enforcement officer of the agency:
(A) Category A.
(i) There is a finding of probable cause by a court that the officer
committed Category A conduct.
(ii) There is any decision or findings of fact or verdict regarding
allegations that the officer committed Category A conduct, including a judicial
decision and any appeal from a decision.
(iii) The agency receives a credible complaint against the officer
that alleges that the officer committed Category A conduct.
* * *
(2) As part of his or her the executive officer’s report, the executive
officer of the agency or the chair of the civilian review board shall provide to
the Council and the community police oversight board having jurisdiction a
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 5 of 17
copy of any relevant documents associated with the report, including any
findings, decision, and the agency’s investigative report.
(b) The Council and the community police oversight board having
jurisdiction shall provide a copy of any report and the relevant documents
provided with it to the Council Advisory Committee, which shall recommend
any appropriate action to take in regard to a law enforcement officer who is the
subject of that report. The Council Advisory Committee shall give deference
to any appropriate action recommended by the community police oversight
board.
(c) The Executive Director of the Council and the Chair of the community
police oversight board having jurisdiction shall report to the Attorney General
and the State’s Attorney of jurisdiction any allegations that an officer
committed Category A conduct.
Sec. 5. 20 V.S.A. § 2410 is amended to read:
§ 2410. COUNCIL ADVISORY COMMITTEE
(a) Creation. There is created the Council Advisory Committee to provide
advice to the Council regarding its duties under this subchapter.
(1) The Committee shall specifically advise and assist the Council in
developing procedures to ensure that allegations of unprofessional conduct by
law enforcement officers are investigated fully and fairly, and to ensure that
appropriate action is taken in regard to those allegations. The Committee shall
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 6 of 17
consider any report submitted by a community police oversight board in the
exercise of its duties under this section.
* * *
(c) Assistance. The Executive Director of the Council or designee shall
attend Committee meetings as a resource for the Committee. The Chair of a
community police oversight board shall attend Committee meetings if the
Committee is advising and assisting with an incident within the jurisdiction of
the community police oversight board.
* * *
Sec. 6. 24 V.S.A. chapter 56 is added to read:
CHAPTER 56. COMMUNITY POLICE OVERSIGHT BOARDS
§ 1944. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “BIPOC” means Black, Indigenous, and other Persons of Color.
(2) “Community police oversight board” means a board created pursuant
to section 1945 of this chapter.
(3) “Law enforcement agency” means a municipal police department, a
sheriff’s department, the provider of law enforcement services pursuant to an
intermunicipal services agreement under section 1938 of this title, or the
provider of law enforcement services for a union municipal district pursuant to
section 4866 of this title.
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 7 of 17
(4) “Law enforcement officer” means a member of a law enforcement
agency.
(5) “Legislative body” means the mayor or other chief executive officer
and board of alderman of a city, the selectboard of a town, the trustees of a
village, or the designated representatives of a region as defined in subdivision
(8) of this section.
(6) “Municipal” or “municipality” means a city, town, or incorporated
village.
(7) “Officer-involved death or serious bodily injury” means the death or
serious bodily injury of an individual that results directly from an action of a
law enforcement officer while the law enforcement officer is on duty or while
the law enforcement officer is off duty but performing activities that are within
the scope of the officer’s law enforcement duties.
(8) “Region” or “regional” means the political subdivisions subject to an
intermunicipal police services agreement pursuant to section 1938 of this title
or participating in a union municipal district pursuant to section 4866 of this
title.
(9) “Serious bodily injury” has the same meaning as in 13 V.S.A.
§ 1021.
(10) “Unprofessional conduct” has the same meaning as in 20 V.S.A.
§ 2401
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 8 of 17
§ 1945. CREATION AND PURPOSE
(a) In order to promote and protect the health, safety, and welfare of the
public, it is in the public interest to provide for the creation of municipal and
regional community police oversight boards.
(b) Community police oversight boards are law enforcement oversight
mechanisms that shall receive and investigate all complaints against municipal
and regional law enforcement agencies and officers and publish public reports
of its investigations and any recommended sanctions for consideration and
adjudication by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council.
(c) Community police oversight boards shall offer to the Vermont Criminal
Justice Council continuing programs of instruction in up-to-date methods of
law enforcement and the administration of criminal justice.
(d) It is the responsibility of community police oversight boards to engage
with its municipal or regional community on an ongoing basis regarding issues
of community policing and strategies to improve policing in its jurisdiction.
(e) Community police oversight boards shall participate in the negotiation
of collective bargaining agreements involving its municipal or regional law
enforcement officers.
§ 1946. COMMUNITY POLICE OVERSIGHT BOARD MEMBERSHIP
(a) Each community police oversight board shall consist of an odd number
of at least seven members appointed and approved by the legislative body of
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 9 of 17
the municipality or region. Each legislative body shall create a procedure for
appointment and approval of a board’s membership in accordance with the
law. The members of the board shall serve for terms of three years.
(b) A legislative body shall solicit recommendations for board members
with diverse and historically marginalized backgrounds within its municipality
or region. A legislative body may appoint not more than one active or retired
law enforcement officer to the board. No member listed in subdivisions (1)–
(5) of this subsection shall have a spouse, domestic partner, parent, child, or
sibling who is a current or former law enforcement officer. Each board shall
include:
(1) at least one individual from the BIPOC community;
(2) at least one individual with a lived experience directly impacted by
law enforcement, which includes involvement with the criminal justice system
combined with homelessness, physical or psychiatric disability, mental health
condition, or a substance use disorder;
(3) at least one representative from a civil rights organization or its
designee;
(4) at least one individual with expertise in the fields of mental health,
juvenile justice, civil liberties, or disability rights; and
(5) at least one State-licensed attorney with experience civil or human
rights violations.
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 10 of 17
(c) A legislative body shall appoint a chair of the board within its
jurisdiction from among the members set for in subdivision (b)(1) of this
section.
(d) Membership on a board does not constitute the holding of an office for
any purpose, and members of a board shall not be required to take and file
oaths of office before serving on a board.
(e) The members of a board shall be entitled to receive per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted from monies
appropriated by each municipality or region.
(f) A member of a board shall not be disqualified from holding any public
office or employment and shall not forfeit any office or employment, by reason
of the member’s appointment to a board, notwithstanding any statute,
ordinance, or charter to the contrary.
§ 1947. MEETINGS
(a) Each board shall meet at least once each quarter of each year. Special
meetings may be called by the chair of a board or upon the written request of a
majority of a board’s members.
(b) Each board shall adopt rules as to quorum and procedures with respect
to the conduct of its meetings and other affairs.
(c)(1) A member of a board may designate in writing a person within the
member’s agency or association to attend a meeting or meetings of the
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 11 of 17
member’s board. The designation shall be filed with the chair of the member’s
board.
(2) A person so designated shall have the same voting rights and
responsibilities as the member at such meeting or meetings, but that designee
shall not automatically assume the member’s place as an officer of the
member’s board.
§ 1948. POWERS AND DUTIES
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of 20 V.S.A. chapter 151, each board
shall receive, investigate, and address:
(1) all grievances and complaints filed by members of the public against
a law enforcement agency within its municipality or region;
(2) all complaints of unprofessional conduct;
(3) all incidents in which a law enforcement officer acting within the
scope of authority of the law enforcement agency in its municipality or region
in which the officer uses physical force upon another person that results in
death or serious bodily injury to the person;
(4) all incidents that result in an officer-involved death; and
(5) all incidents of alleged ill-treatment or misconduct that come to the
attention of the board, regardless of whether those cases are the subject of any
specific formal complaint or grievance.
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 12 of 17
(b) Each board may contract with or hire an attorney licensed by the State
to provide legal services. Legal services may include the proper conduct of its
affairs, assistance to a board in the lawful and orderly conduct of its open
meetings, and other nondisciplinary business, such as making procedural and
parliamentary rulings. Each board may contract with or hire an attorney
licensed by the State to assist with conducting investigations or drafting
reports.
(c) Each board may contract with or hire investigators who have
successfully met the standards of training for a Level III law enforcement
officer under 20 V.S.A. chapter 151. An investigator contracted or hired by a
board shall not have previously been affiliated with or employed by a law
enforcement agency within a board’s jurisdiction.
(d) Each board may hire or contract with staff to assist in administrative,
secretarial, or any other services a board may deem necessary.
(e) Each board may analyze policing trends across the State based on
cumulative complaints, lawsuits, law enforcement incidents resulting in serious
bodily harm, and all other reporting deemed relevant. A board may collaborate
with boards from other jurisdictions within the State, the Vermont Criminal
Justice Council, or any other entities it deems appropriate to compile, analyze,
and publish such data. The data may be used to offer training
recommendations to the Vermont Criminal Justice Council.
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 13 of 17
(f) Each board may, in addition:
(1) accept and administer under this chapter and for its purposes
contributions, capital grants, gifts, services, and other financial assistance from
any individual, association, corporation, or other organization having an
interest in law enforcement accountability, and from its municipality, region,
state, and the United States and any of their agencies and instrumentalities,
corporate or otherwise;
(2) adopt rules to implement the provisions of this chapter; and
(3) perform such other acts as may be necessary or appropriate to carry
out the purposes of this chapter.
§ 1949. INVESTIGATIONS
For the purpose of carrying out an investigation pursuant to this section, a
board shall have the authority to:
(1) Request and receive any assistance and information from a law
enforcement agency or officer that a board deems necessary for the discharge
of its duties and responsibilities.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, inspect and examine all
law enforcement agency records and documents, including law enforcement
officer personnel records, documents, and body camera footage, that a board
deems relevant to any matter being investigated by a board.
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 14 of 17
(3) Administer oaths and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance or
testimony of a witness or the production of any relevant evidence, including
books, papers, documents, records, photographs, recordings, reports, and
tangible objects maintained by a law enforcement agency within its
municipality or region. If a witness refuses to attend, testify, or produce
materials as required by the subpoena, a board or its designee may compel the
witness to comply by petition to the Superior Court of proper jurisdiction
pursuant to Rule 37 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.
(4) Contract with and designate external organizations to assist with or
conduct investigations.
§ 1950. DISPOSITION OF COMPLAINTS; REPORTS
(a) A board may summarily dismiss a grievance or complaint filed by a
member of the public pursuant to subdivision 1948(a)(1) of this chapter only
when a board determines that:
(1) the complainant’s interest is not sufficiently related to the subject
matter of the grievance or complaint;
(2) the grievance or complaint is trivial, frivolous, irrelevant, without
merit, or in bad faith;
(3) resources are insufficient for an adequate investigation of the
grievance or complaint; or
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 15 of 17
(4) the grievance or complaint is the subject of undue delay to justify an
examination of its merit.
(b) A board shall issue a public report detailing its findings at the
conclusion of an investigation of any matter within the authority of the board.
The report shall articulate findings of fact relative to the matter, including any
disciplinary decisions and personnel changes made by the law enforcement
agency, and recommendations relating to the disposition of the matter and any
associated sanction. A board’s report shall be given deference by the Vermont
Criminal Justice Council in its adjudication of an unprofessional conduct
complaint and any related sanction pursuant to 20 V.S.A. chapter 151,
subchapter 2.
(1) An investigation concluding that a complaint or grievance against a
law enforcement agency or officer pursuant to section 1948 of this chapter
could not be substantiated shall detail the underlying reasons for the conclusion
in the public report. The investigation shall be closed but shall be archived and
may be used as an aggravating factor in any subsequent investigation by a
board of similar conduct by the same law enforcement agency or officer that is
substantiated.
(2) An investigation substantiating a complaint or grievance against a
law enforcement agency or officer pursuant to section 1948 of this chapter
shall articulate the nature of any substantiated conduct, identify the underlying
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 16 of 17
deficiencies of the conduct, and contain the board’s sanction recommendation
to be considered by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council pursuant to this
subsection.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of 1 V.S.A. § 317, the content of any
investigation, including the identity of a witness or victim, any procedure,
testimony taken, document or other tangible evidence produced, or any answer
made under this section is confidential and not subject to disclosure as a public
record or public document unless and until:
(1) confidentiality is waived by the person upon whom the investigative
demand is made;
(2) disclosure is authorized by a Superior Court; or
(3) disclosure is made by a federal court or federal agency.
Sec. 7. 21 V.S.A. chapter 22 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 22. VERMONT MUNICIPAL LABOR RELATIONS ACT
* * *
§ 1722. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(13) “Municipal employer” means a city, town, village, fire district,
lighting district, consolidated water district, housing authority, union municipal
district, community police oversight board as used in 24 V.S.A. chapter 56 or
VT LEG #380966 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.361
2025 Page 17 of 17
its designee, or any of the political subdivisions of the State of Vermont that
employs five or more employees as defined in this section.
* * *
§ 1725. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING PROCEDURE
* * *
(b) The municipal employer shall be represented in the bargaining by its
legislative body or its designated representative or representatives. If the
municipal employer is a supervisory district or supervisory union, it shall be
represented by the school board negotiations council, and the bargaining unit
shall be represented by the school employees’ negotiations council. If the
bargaining unit includes a municipal public safety employee, as defined in
subdivision 1722(22)(C) of this chapter, the municipal employer shall include
representation from the relevant community police oversight board as used in
24 V.S.A. chapter 56 or its designee.
* * *
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380966 v.1